West Virginia, session 2026, HB4284.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64- 9 - 1. Board of Barbers and Cosmetologists. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 28, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-27-6 of this code, relating to the Board of Barbers and Cosmetologists (waxing specialists, 3 CSR 14), is authorized.